Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE B. STATE FACILITIES

CHAPTER 553. SAN ANTONIO STATE SUPPORTED LIVING CENTER

Sec. 553.022. SAN ANTONIO STATE SUPPORTED LIVING CENTER. (a) The San Antonio State Supported Living Center is for the education, care, and treatment of persons with an intellectual disability.

(b) The Department of Aging and Disability Services may enter into agreements with the Department of State Health Services for use of the excess facilities of a public health hospital as defined by Section 13.033 in the operation of the state supported living center.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1344, eff. April 2, 2015.